Nebraska, session 109, LB108.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 16-1024, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
16-1024 (1)(a) Except when subdivision (b) of this subsection applies,
each Each firefighter participating in the retirement system shall contribute
to the retirement system a sum equal to:
(i) Until September 30, 2024, six and one-half percent of his or her
salary;
(ii) Beginning October 1, 2024, and until September 30, 2025, eight and
seven-tenths percent of his or her salary;
(iii) Beginning October 1, 2025, and until September 30, 2026, ten and
seven-tenths percent of his or her salary; and
(iv) Beginning October 1, 2026, twelve and seven-tenths percent of his or
her salary.
(b) Beginning March 1, 2025, each firefighter shall contribute to the
retirement system a sum equal to six and one-half percent of his or her salary
if such firefighter is:
(i) Employed as a firefighter by a city:
(A) With a population of more than sixty thousand inhabitants; and
(B) That is located in a county with a population of more than one hundred
thousand inhabitants;
(ii) Participating in the retirement system; and
(iii) Covered by an absolute coverage group.
(c) Any such payment described in subdivision (a) or (b) of this
subsection (b) Such payment shall be made by regular payroll deductions from
his or her periodic salary and shall be credited to his or her employee account
on a monthly basis. Each such account shall also be credited with regular
interest.
(d) (c) Beginning July 20, 2024, each firefighter covered by an absolute
coverage group and participating in the retirement system shall receive an
offset from his or her retirement system contribution equal to six and two-
tenths percent of his or her salary. This subdivision (1)(d) (1)(c) shall not
apply to any firefighter, covered by an absolute coverage group, employed as a
firefighter by a city with a population of more than sixty thousand inhabitants
located in a county with a population of more than one hundred thousand
inhabitants.
(2) Each city of the first class with firefighters participating in a
retirement system shall pick up the firefighters' contributions required by
subsection (1) of this section for all compensation paid on or after January 1,
1984, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer
contributions in determining federal income tax treatment under the Internal
Revenue Code, except that the city shall continue to withhold federal income
taxes based upon such contributions until the Internal Revenue Service or the
federal courts rule that, pursuant to section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue
Code, such contributions shall not be included as gross income of the employee
until such time as they are distributed from the retirement system. The city
shall pay the employee contributions from the same source of funds which is
used in paying compensation to the employee. The city shall pick up the
employee contributions by a salary deduction either through a reduction in the
cash salary of the employee or a combination of a reduction in salary and
offset against a future salary increase. In no event shall a firefighter be
given an option to choose to receive the amount of the required contribution in
lieu of having such contribution paid directly to the retirement system.
(3) Each firefighter participating in the retirement system shall be
entitled to make voluntary cash contributions to the retirement system in an
amount not to exceed the contribution limitations established by the Internal
Revenue Code. Voluntary contributions shall be credited to the employee account
and shall thereafter be credited with regular interest. A voluntary
contribution shall become a part of the Firefighters Retirement System Fund and
shall be held, administered, invested, and distributed in the same manner as
any other employee contribution to the retirement system.
Sec. 2. Section 16-1025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
16-1025 (1)(a) Except when subdivision (b) of this subsection applies,
beginning Beginning January 1, 1984, each city of the first class with
firefighters participating in a retirement system shall contribute to the
retirement system a sum equal to:
-1-

LB108 LB108
2025 2025
(i) Until September 30, 2025, thirteen percent of each such participating
firefighter's periodic salary;
(ii) Beginning October 1, 2025, and until September 30, 2026, fourteen
percent of each such participating firefighter's periodic salary; and
(iii) Beginning October 1, 2026, fifteen percent of each such
participating firefighter's periodic salary.
(b) Beginning March 1, 2025, each city of the first class shall contribute
to the retirement system a sum equal to thirteen percent of the periodic salary
of each participating firefighter described in subdivision (b)(iii) of this
subsection if such city:
(i) Has a population of more than sixty thousand inhabitants;
(ii) Is located in a county with a population of more than one hundred
thousand inhabitants; and
(iii) Employs any firefighter who is:
(A) Participating in the retirement system; and
(B) Covered by an absolute coverage group.
(c) Any such payment described in subdivision (a) or (b) of this
subsection (b) Such payment shall be credited to his or her employer account on
a monthly basis. Each such account shall also be credited with regular
interest. The city shall also contribute to the employer account of any
firefighter employed by the city on January 1, 1984, an amount equal to the
employee's contributions, without interest, that were made to the city prior to
January 1, 1984, with such contribution to be made at the time the firefighter
retires or terminates employment with the city. The city may contribute such
amount before the firefighter's retirement or termination of employment or
credit interest on such contribution.
(d) (c) Beginning July 20, 2024, each city of the first class with
firefighters covered by an absolute coverage group and participating in a
retirement system shall receive an offset from the retirement system
contribution equal to six and two-tenths of each such participating
firefighter's periodic salary. This subdivision (1)(d) (1)(c) shall not apply
to any city with a population of sixty thousand or more inhabitants located in
a county with a population of one hundred thousand or more inhabitants with
firefighters covered by an absolute coverage group.
(2) Each such city shall contribute any additional amounts necessary to
fund retirement or other retirement plan benefits not provided by employee
contributions or city contributions to the employer account required by
subsection (1) of this section. Such additional contributions shall be
accumulated in an unallocated employer account of the Firefighters Retirement
System Fund and used to provide the benefits, if any, specified in sections
16-1027 and 16-1029 to 16-1031 which are not otherwise funded by the
firefighter's retirement value. Funds needed to provide for a firefighter's
benefits shall be transferred from the unallocated employer account when and as
such funds are needed. All funds committed by the city to the funding of a
firefighter pension system on January 1, 1984, that are not transferred to the
firefighters employee accounts shall be transferred to the unallocated employer
account.
Sec. 3. Original sections 16-1024 and 16-1025, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-